Arkansas, session 2025, HB1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-87-315(b), concerning the definition of
"full practice authority" relating to certified nurse midwives, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) As used in this section, “full practice authority” means the
authority of a healthcare professional to:
(1) Evaluate patients;
(2) Diagnose medical conditions;
(3) Order and interpret diagnostic tests;
(4) Initiate and manage treatment and care plans, including
appropriate comanagement or transfer of high-risk patients to other
healthcare professionals as needed; and
(5) Prescribe and administer drugs listed in Schedules III — V
without a collaborative practice agreement or supervision of another
healthcare professional when performing healthcare services;
(6) Admit and discharge patients from a licensed hospital if
granted privileges; and
*JMB110*
01-29-2025 08:58:04 JMB110

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1181
(7) Complete, sign, and submit forms for a certificate of birth
or death certificate.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-18-401(b) and (c), concerning birth
registration generally, are amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) When a birth occurs in an institution or en route thereto, the
person in charge of the institution or his or her authorized designee shall
obtain the personal data, prepare the certificate, certify that the child was
born alive at the place, time, and date stated on the certificate either by
signature or in an approved electronic process, and file the certificate as
directed in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) The physician, certified nurse midwife, or other person in
attendance shall provide the medical information required by the certificate
within seventy-two (72) hours after the birth.
(c) When a birth occurs outside an institution:
(1) The certificate shall be prepared and filed by one (1) of
the following in the indicated order of priority:
(A) The physician or certified nurse midwife in attendance
at or immediately after the birth, or in the absence of such a person;
(B) Any other person in attendance at or immediately after
the birth, or in the absence of such a person; or
(C) The father, the mother, or in the absence of the
father and the inability of the mother, the person in charge of the premises
where the birth occurred; and
(2) The division shall determine what evidence may be required
to establish the fact of birth.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-18-601(c)(1)(A)(i), concerning medical
certification for a death certificate, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A)(i) The medical certification shall be completed, signed, and
returned to the funeral director within three (3) business days after receipt
of the death certificate by the physician or certified nurse midwife in
charge of the patient's care for the illness or condition that resulted in
death, except when inquiry is required by § 12-12-315, § 12-12-318, or § 14-
15-301 et seq.

01-29-2025 08:58:04 JMB110

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1181
/s/Bentley



































01-29-2025 08:58:04 JMB110